en: Doppelbock beers, Doppelbock
xx: Doppelbock beers, Doppelbock

en: Eisbock beers, Eisbock
xx: Eisbock beers, Eisbock

en: Maibock beers, Maibock, Helles Bock, Heller Bock
xx: Maibock beers, Maibock, Helles Bock, Heller Bock

en: Weizenbock beers, Weizenbock
xx: Weizenbock beers, Weizenbock

en: Hefeweizen beers, Hefeweizen
xx: Hefeweizen

en: Pale lagers
xx: Pale lagers
bg: Светли лагери
de: Helle Biere
es: Cervezas claras
fi: Vaaleat lagerit
fr: Lagers blondes
he: לאגרים בהירים
lt: Šviesūs lageriai
nl: Lichte lagers
pl: Jasne lagerowe

en: Märzen beers, Märzen, Marzen
xx: Märzen beers, Märzen, Marzen

en: Dortmunder export, Beers from Dortmund, Dortmunder export beers
xx: Dortmunder export
de: Dortmunder Biere, Dortmunder Bier
hu: Dortmundi sörök
nl: Dortmunder bieren

en: Munich Helles beers, Munich Helles, Helles, Münchner Hell
xx: Munich Helles beers, Munich Helles, Helles, Münchner Hell

en: Oktoberfest beers
xx: Oktoberfest beers
de: Oktoberfestbier
es: Cervezas de Oktoberfest
fr: Bières d'Oktoberfest
it: Birre di Oktoberfest
nl: Oktoberfestbieren

en: Festbier beers, Festbier
xx: Festbier beers, Festbier

en: Pilsners, Pilsner, Pilsner beers, Pils
xx: Pilsners, Pilsner, Pils
da: pilsnere
hu: Pilseni típusú sörök, Pilseni sörök, Pilsner sörök
nl: Pilseners

en: Industrial beer, Factory beer
xx: Industrial beer, Factory beer
de: Industriebier, Fabrikbier
es: Cerveza industrial
fr: Bieres industrielles
hu: Ipari sör
it: Birra industriale
lt: Industriinis alus
nl: Industrieel bier
pl: Piwo przemysłowe

en: Unfiltered beers
xx: Unfiltered beers
de: Ungfiltriertes Bier
es: Cervezas sin filtrar
fr: Bières non filtrées
hu: Szűretlen sörök
it: Birre non filtrate
lt: Nefiltruotos alus
nl: Ongefilterde bieren
pl: Piwa niefiltrowane

en: Unpasteurized beers
xx: Unpasteurized beers
de: Unpasteurisierte Biere
es: Cervezas sin pasteurizar
fr: Bières non pasteurisées
hu: Pasztörizálatlan sörök
it: Birre non pastorizzate
lt: Nepasterizuotos alus
nl: Ongepasteuriseerde bieren
pl: Piwa niepasteryzowane

en: Strong beers, 8% beers, Beers with 8° alcohol or more
de: Starkbier
es: Cervezas fuertes
fi: vahvat oluet
fr: Bières fortes, Bières à plus de 8%, Bières à plus de 8° alcool, Bières à 8%, Bières à 8° alcool
hr: Jaka piva
hu: Erős sörök
it: Birre forti, Birre ad alta gradazione alcolica
lt: Stiprusis alus
nl: Sterke bieren
pl: Piwa mocne

en: Beers without gluten, gluten free beers
bg: Бира без глутен
da: glutenfrie øl
de: Glutenfreies Bier
es: Cervezas sin gluten
fr: Bières sans gluten
hr: Piva bez glutena
hu: Gluténmentes sörök
it: Birre senza glutine
lt: Alus be glitimo
nl: Glutenvrije bieren
pl: Piwa bezglutenowe
pt: Cervejas sem glúten

en: Special beers, Special beers with 5° alcohol, Special beers with 6° alcohol
de: Spezialbiere, Spezialbiere mit 5° Alkohol, Spezialbiere mit 6° Alkohol
es: Cervezas especiales, Cervezas especiales con 5° de alcohol, Cervezas especiales con 6° de alcohol
fr: Bières spéciales à 5° d'alcool, Bières spéciales à 6° d'alcool
hr: Posebna piva
hu: Speciális sörök
it: Birre speciali, Birre speciali con 5° di alcol, Birre speciali con 6° di alcol
lt: Specialios alus, Specialios alus su 5° alkoholiu, Specialios alus su 6° alkoholiu
nl: Speciaalbieren, Speciaalbieren met 5° alcohol, Speciaalbieren met 6° alcohol
pl: Piwa specjalne, Piwa specjalne z 5° alkoholem, Piwa specjalne z 6° alkoholem

en: 5% beer, Beer with 5° alcohol, Beer with 4° alcohol
fr: Bière à 4-5° d'alcool, Bière à 4%, Bière à 5%
hr: 5% piva
hu: 5%-os sörök
it: Birre 5%, Birra 5%
lt: 5% alaus, Alus su 5° alkoholiu, Alus su 4° alkoholiu
nl: Bier met 5% alcohol, Bier met 4% alcohol
pl: Piwo 5%, Piwo z 5° alkoholem, Piwo z 4° alkoholem
zh: 5% 啤酒

en: Light beers, Beers with low alcohol-content, 3% beers, Beers with 3° alcohol
fr: Bières faiblement alcoolisées, Bières à 3° d'alcool, Bières à 3%